src-fst-morphology-stems-abbreviations.lexc.md
# File containing abbreviations 

## Lexica for adding tags and periods

Splitting in 4 + 1  groups, because of the preprocessor

* **LEXICON Abbreviation   **
1. The ITRAB ;	    lexicon (intransitive abbrs) Ltd.
1. The TRNUMAB ;   lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numerals)
1. The TRAB ;	    lexicon (transitive abbrs) tri. 
1. The SYMBOLS ;   lexicon (misc. symbols)

## The sublexica

### Dividing between abbreviations with and witout final period

ABBREVIATIONS 
these still need development 2015-09-11

* **LEXICON ab-noun   **

### The lexicons that add tags

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   **  The bulk

+Adv+ABBR: RHyph ;

* **LEXICON ab-dot-noun   **  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

+ABBR:%.%> # ;

* **LEXICON SYMBOLconnector   **

* **LEXICON SYMBOLsuff   **

## The abbreviation lexicon itself

* **LEXICON SYMBOLS   ** is for iscellaneous abbr symbols

* **LEXICON ITRAB   ** are intransitive abbreviations, A.S. etc.

*  ITRAB_sms2x ;         intransitive abbreviations
These are measurements postposed after numerals
*  TRNUMABPO_sms2x ;         postpositional transitive abbreviations with numerals preceding
*  TRABPO_sms2x ;         postpositional transitive abbreviations

This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive
abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
the sentnece (when next word has small letters) can be 
considered as true cases.

* **LEXICON TRNUMAB   ** contains abbreviations who are transitive in front of numerals, i.e. preposed

For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.

* ** TRNUMAB_sms2x ; ** contains abbreviations in xml preposed

* **LEXICON TRAB   ** contains preposed transitive abbreviations 

This lexicon is for abbrs that always have a constituent following it.

* ** TRAB_sms2x ; ** contains preposed transitive abbreviations xml

This class contains homonyms, which are both abbrs for 
which numerals are complements and normal words. The abbreviation usage
is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
the sentnece can be considered as true cases.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc)</small>

---
